Rhode Island statutes. Title 10 Courts and Civil Procedure — Procedure in Particular Actions
Chapter 13 Relief of Poor Debtors

10-13-1.
Application to take poor debtor’s oath.

Except as is otherwise provided by §

10-13-2

, any person who shall be imprisoned for debt whether on a writ of arrest issued at the commencement of an action, mesne process, or execution, or on execution awarded against him or her as defendant in any action to recover the possession of land or trespass to land, in which title to the land was in dispute between the parties, may complain to the justice of any district court in the county where the person shall be committed that he or she has no estate, real or personal, wherewith to support himself or herself in a correctional institution or to pay institution charges and may request to be admitted to take the poor debtor’s oath.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 260, § 1; C.P.A. 1905, § 1153; G.L. 1909, ch. 326, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 377, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 563, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1956, ch. 3721, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

10-13-1

; P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 56.

10-13-2.
Persons not entitled to take oath.

No person who shall be committed on execution awarded against him or her as plaintiff in replevin or as defendant in any action on a penal statute or in any action for conversion or detention of personal property, or for any malicious injury to the person, health or reputation of the plaintiff in such suit, or for seduction, or for any trespass, excepting only such as are particularly named in §

10-13-1

, shall be deemed to be within the meaning of the provisions of that section or entitled to be admitted to take the oath as provided in §

10-13-1

.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 260, § 10; G.L. 1909, ch. 326, § 10; G.L. 1923, ch. 377, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 563, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

10-13-2

; P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 56; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 34.

10-13-3.
Citation to creditor to show cause against debtor’s oath.

The justice shall forthwith issue a citation to the creditor, if within this state, or if the creditor does not live within this state, then to his or her agent or attorney of record within this state, or if he or she has no agent or attorney, then to the creditor without the state, to appear at the time and place as the justice shall appoint, to show cause, if any he or she have, why the person complaining as provided in §

10-13-1

should not be admitted to take the poor debtor’s oath.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 260, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 326, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 377, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 563, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

10-13-3

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 34.

10-13-4.
Service of citation on creditor.

The citation shall be served on the creditor, his or her agent or attorney as provided in §

10-13-3

, seven (7) days at least before the time appointed as provided in §

10-13-3

, by reading the citation to him or her, or by leaving an attested copy with some person living at his or her last and usual place of abode, by a member of the division of sheriffs or either of the town sergeants or constables in the county in which the creditor, his or her agent or attorney, shall reside. If the creditor does not live or have any agent or attorney within this state, the service shall be made upon the creditor by any disinterested person.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 260, § 3; G.L. 1909, ch. 326, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 377, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 563, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

10-13-4

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 34; P.L. 2012, ch. 324, § 28.

10-13-5.
Citations to state as creditor.

Every person imprisoned or liable to be imprisoned in any suit in favor of the state, entitled to the oath prescribed in §

10-13-8

, may apply for and have a citation to the state, to show cause why he or she should not be admitted to take the debtor’s oath.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 260, § 25; G.L. 1909, ch. 326, § 25; G.L. 1923, ch. 377, § 25; G.L. 1938, ch. 563, § 25; G.L. 1956, §

10-13-5

.

10-13-6.
Service of citation on attorney general.

The citation described in §

10-13-5

shall be issued to and served upon the attorney general, in the same manner and with the same effect as is provided in the case of creditors other than the state.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 260, § 26; G.L. 1909, ch. 326, § 26; G.L. 1923, ch. 377, § 26; G.L. 1938, ch. 563, § 26; G.L. 1956, §

10-13-6

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 34.

10-13-7.
Administration of oath — Assignment of estate.

The justice of any district court in the county where the prisoner is committed may at the time and place appointed examine the return of the citation, and if it shall appear to have been duly served, may administer the oath prescribed in §

10-13-8

to the party imprisoned as provided in §

10-13-5

, if, after fully examining the prisoner under oath and hearing the parties, the justice shall think it proper so to do; provided, the applicant shall then and there first make and execute a deed of assignment of all his or her estate of every kind and wherever the estate may be, except what is exempted from attachment by law, other than debts secured by bills of exchange or negotiable promissory notes, to the warden and his or her successor in his or her office and his or her heirs and assigns, in trust for the benefit of all his or her creditors in proportion to their respective demands.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 260, § 4; C.P.A. 1905, § 1233; G.L. 1909, ch. 326, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 377, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 563, § 4; impl. am. P.L. 1956, ch. 3721, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

10-13-7

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 34.

10-13-8.
Form of debtor’s oath.

The oath to be administered in such a case shall be as follows: “I do solemnly swear (or affirm) that I have not any estate, real or personal, in possession, remainder, or reversion over $ 10.00 (or except what is exempt from attachment by law not herein enumerated) nor any debts secured by bills of exchange or negotiable promissory notes, and that I have not, since the commencement of this suit against me or at any other time, directly or indirectly, sold, leased, or otherwise conveyed or disposed of to, or intrusted any person or persons whomsoever with, all or any part of the estate, real or personal, whereof I have been the lawful owner or possessor, with any intent or design to secure the property or to receive or to expect any profit or advantage therefrom for myself or for any of my children or family or any other person, or have caused or suffered to be done anything else whatsoever whereby any of my creditors may be defrauded, so help me God (or this affirmation I make and give upon peril of the penalty of perjury)”.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 260, § 5; G.L. 1909, ch. 326, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 377, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 563, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

10-13-8

.

10-13-9.
Certificate of justice as to oath.

The oath being administered and taken by the prisoner, the justice shall deliver to him or her a certificate thereof under, his or her hand and seal, in the following form:

To warden of the correctional institution at in the county of I, the subscriber, authorized by the statute in such case made and provided, do certify that a poor prisoner confined upon mesne process (or otherwise, as the case may be) in the correctional institution at aforesaid, has caused the party at whose suit he or she was so confined, to be notified according to law, of his or her the said desire of being admitted to take the poor debtor’s oath; that in my opinion the said has not any estate, either real or personal, except what is exempt from attachment by law (or, over $10.00, as the case may be), and that he or she has not conveyed or concealed his or her estate with design to secure the same to his or her own use or to defraud his or her creditors; and that I have, after due caution to the said administered to him or her the oath (or, affirmation,) prescribed by law to be administered to poor debtors. Witness, my hand and seal, this day of A.D., Justice of the District Court of the
Judicial District.

Click to view

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 260, § 6; C.P.A. 1905, § 1154; G.L. 1909, ch. 326, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 377, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 563, § 6; impl. am. P.L. 1956, ch. 3721, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

10-13-9

.

10-13-10.
Discharge of prisoner.

Whenever any prisoner shall present a certificate, as is prescribed in §

10-13-9

, to the warden of the institution in which he or she is imprisoned, the warden shall immediately discharge him or her from his or her commitment at the suit of the creditor named in the certificate.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 260, § 7; G.L. 1909, ch. 326, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 377, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 563, § 7; impl. am. P.L. 1956, ch. 3721, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

10-13-10

.

10-13-11.
Detainment for fees prohibited.

No person who has been admitted to take the oath as provided in §

10-13-8

shall be retained in a correctional institution for the prison fees or for the fees of the justice before whom he or she may have taken such oath.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 260, § 8; G.L. 1909, ch. 326, § 8; G.L. 1923, ch. 377, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 563, § 8; impl. am. P.L. 1956, ch. 3721, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

10-13-11

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 34.

10-13-12.
Responsibility of warden for property — Assignment to or on direction of creditor.

No warden of any institution receiving an assignment under §

10-13-7

shall be held responsible to any person for any property of any assignor, except such as he or she has actually received into his or her possession; provided, that he or she shall assign all the interest he or she shall obtain thereby to the committing creditor, if a resident of this state, on his or her request, or to such person, being a resident thereof, as the creditor shall name, to be held by the creditor or person, his or her heirs, executors, administrators and assigns, for the purposes and trusts set forth in the deed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 260, § 9; G.L. 1909, ch. 326, § 9; G.L. 1923, ch. 377, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 563, § 9; impl. am. P.L. 1956, ch. 3721, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

10-13-12

.

10-13-13.
Second citation to creditor by debtor not admitted to oath.

If a debtor take out a citation to his or her committing creditor and have the citation served and subsequently withdraw the citation, or if upon trial he or she shall not be admitted to take the oath prescribed in §

10-13-8

, he or she shall not be entitled to another citation to the same creditor unless on proof of some change of circumstances after the taking out of the first citation, a statement of which change of circumstances shall be annexed to, or cited in, the second citation and form a part thereof.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 260, § 11; G.L. 1909, ch. 326, § 11; G.L. 1923, ch. 377, § 11; G.L. 1938, ch. 563, § 11; G.L. 1956, §

10-13-13

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 34.

10-13-14.
Administration of debtor’s oath pending original action.

The court before which any action is pending for the recovery of any debt or demand for which the defendant, if committed to a correctional institution thereon, would be entitled to be admitted to take the oath as provided in §

10-13-8

, may administer the oath to the defendant as provided in this chapter.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 260, § 12; C.P.A. 1905, § 1234; G.L. 1909, ch. 326, § 12; G.L. 1923, ch. 377, § 12; G.L. 1938, ch. 563, § 12; impl. am. P.L. 1956, ch. 3721, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

10-13-14

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 34.

10-13-15.
Citation to show cause against oath by defendant.

The defendant in such case may apply to the court in which the action is pending for a citation to the creditor to appear at the court to show cause why the defendant should not be admitted to take the oath.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 260, § 13; C.P.A. 1905, § 1155; G.L. 1909, ch. 326, § 13; G.L. 1923, ch. 377, § 13; G.L. 1938, ch. 563, § 13; G.L. 1956, §

10-13-15

.

10-13-16.
Service of citation.

The citation shall be served by any deputy sheriff, town sergeant, or constable, at least four (4) days before the time therein appointed for taking the oath, by reading the citation to the plaintiff or by leaving an attested copy thereof at his or her last and usual place of abode in this state, with some person living there, and the citation shall be returned to the court in which the action is pending. If the plaintiff does not reside in this state, service of the citation may be made in like manner upon the agent or attorney of record of the plaintiff in this state.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 260, § 14; C.P.A. 1905, § 1156; G.L. 1909, ch. 326, § 14; G.L. 1923, ch. 377, § 14; G.L. 1938, ch. 563, § 14; G.L. 1956, §

10-13-16

; P.L. 2012, ch. 324, § 28.

10-13-17.
Examination of defendant and administration of oath.

If it shall appear to the court in which the action is pending that notice has been given as provided in §

10-13-16

, the court shall examine the defendant on his or her oath concerning his or her estate and effects and the disposal thereof and may also receive any other evidence offered by the defendant or by the plaintiff, and upon the examination the court may, in its discretion, administer to the defendant the oath.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 260, § 15; C.P.A. 1905, § 1234; G.L. 1909, ch. 326, § 15; G.L. 1923, ch. 377, § 15; G.L. 1938, ch. 563, § 15; G.L. 1956, §

10-13-17

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 34.

10-13-18.
Effect of execution after debtor’s oath.

If the debtor’s oath be administered, the execution which may be issued against the defendant in the action shall run against the goods and chattels or real estate of the defendant and not against his or her body.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 260, § 16; G.L. 1909, ch. 326, § 16; G.L. 1923, ch. 377, § 16; G.L. 1938, ch. 563, § 16; G.L. 1956, §

10-13-18

.

10-13-19.
Application for oath after judgment and before commitment.

Every defendant in any execution, who would, if committed to a correctional institution thereon, and every person against whom final judgment has been rendered in any civil action, who would, if committed to a correctional institution on execution to be issued thereon, be entitled to be admitted to take the oath as provided in this chapter, may apply in the manner as provided in this chapter, for a citation to his or her creditor to show cause why he or she should not be admitted to take the debtor’s oath.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 260, § 17; G.L. 1909, ch. 326, § 17; G.L. 1923, ch. 377, § 17; G.L. 1938, ch. 563, § 17; impl. am. P.L. 1956, ch. 3721, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

10-13-19

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 34.

10-13-20.
Service of citation.

The citation as described in §

10-13-19

shall be served in the same manner as is provided in §

10-13-16

.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 260, § 18; G.L. 1909, ch. 326, § 18; G.L. 1923, ch. 377, § 18; G.L. 1938, ch. 563, § 18; G.L. 1956, §

10-13-20

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 34.

10-13-21.
Administration of oath.

Upon the return of the citation, the magistrate authorized to administer the oath by §

10-13-7

, in the county in which the defendant is liable to be imprisoned, may administer the oath to the defendant, if upon examination of the defendant on oath, and of such other evidence as either party may produce, he or she shall think proper.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 260, § 19; G.L. 1909, ch. 326, § 19; G.L. 1923, ch. 377, § 19; G.L. 1938, ch. 563, § 19; G.L. 1956, §

10-13-21

.

10-13-22.
Effect of execution after oath.

If the defendant be admitted to take the oath, he or she shall thereafter be exempt from imprisonment on the execution or any future execution that may be issued on such judgment, and execution on such judgment shall issue only against the goods and chattels and real estate of the defendant.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 260, § 20; G.L. 1909, ch. 326, § 20; G.L. 1923, ch. 377, § 20; G.L. 1938, ch. 563, § 20; G.L. 1956, §

10-13-22

.

10-13-23.
Certificate as to oath — Certificate of discharge.

The justice administering the oath as provided in §

10-13-7

, pursuant to the provisions of §

10-13-21

, shall give a certificate to that effect, under his or her hand and seal, to the defendant. In all cases the justice who commences the examination under the provisions of this chapter shall alone have the power to sign and seal the certificate of discharge.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 260, § 21; G.L. 1909, ch. 326, § 21; G.L. 1923, ch. 377, § 21; G.L. 1938, ch. 563, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

10-13-23

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 34.

10-13-24.
Assignment for benefit of creditors upon administration of oath.

Whenever the oath as provided in this chapter shall be administered to any defendant, under the provisions of §§

10-13-14

—

10-13-23

he or she shall then and there make an assignment of all his or her estate, real and personal, not exempted from attachment by law, to some responsible inhabitant of this state, his or her heirs and assigns, to be approved by the magistrate administering the oath, in trust for the benefit of all his or her creditors in proportion to their demands, and a copy of the assignment shall be filed by the assignee in the office of the clerk of the court issuing the execution.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 260, § 22; G.L. 1909, ch. 326, § 22; G.L. 1923, ch. 377, § 22; G.L. 1938, ch. 563, § 22; G.L. 1956, §

10-13-24

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 96.

10-13-25.
Party deemed creditor — Effect of executions subsequent to oath.

The person to whom the debt appears, by the process, to belong at the time complaint is made, shall be deemed the creditor within the meaning of the provisions of this chapter. Neither the commitment of the prisoner, nor his or her discharge, shall be a satisfaction of the debt for which he or she was committed. If committed on execution, the plaintiff may take out another execution, which shall not, however, run against the body of the defendant. If suit is brought on the judgment, execution in the suit shall not run against the body of the defendant, nor shall the defendant be held to bail on the writ in such case. If the defendant is committed on mesne process, when he or she receives a certificate as provided in §

10-13-23

, if that fact is shown by plea to the court before which the action is pending, then execution shall not issue against the body of the defendant, but in all such cases execution shall issue against the goods and chattels and real estate of the defendant.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 260, § 23; C.P.A. 1905, § 1234; G.L. 1909, ch. 326, § 23; G.L. 1923, ch. 377, § 23; G.L. 1938, ch. 563, § 23; G.L. 1956, §

10-13-25

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 96.

10-13-26.
Adjournment of hearings.

Any judge of the district court, who shall be present at the time and place to which any citation in behalf of any poor prisoner, issued under the provisions of this chapter, shall be duly returned, may, in the absence of another magistrate, adjourn the hearing thereon to any other time or place, as he or she may think proper, with the same effect as if another judge were present.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 260, § 24; C.P.A. 1905, § 1233; G.L. 1909, ch. 326, § 24; G.L. 1923, ch. 377, § 24; G.L. 1938, ch. 563, § 24; G.L. 1956, §

10-13-26

; P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 23.

10-13-27.
Petition for discharge by prisoner unable to pay tort judgment.

Whenever any person shall have been imprisoned for six (6) months upon a writ of arrest, mesne process, execution, or upon surrender or commitment by bail in any action on any penal statute, actions sounding in tort, including actions for possession of land or trespass to land in which title to the land is not in dispute, or other civil action in which such person is not now entitled to his or her discharge, upon being admitted to take the poor debtor’s oath, the person so imprisoned may petition the justice of the district court in the county in which he or she is imprisoned, setting forth that he or she is detained in prison, the term of his or her imprisonment, the cause of his or her committal, and the name and residence of the person at whose suit he or she was committed, and that he or she is unable to pay the judgment upon which he or she is committed, and to pay his or her prison charges: provided, however, that any person who shall have been imprisoned as provided in this chapter upon a writ issued out of a district court or upon execution wherein the debt or damages and costs shall not exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) may petition as provided in this chapter after ninety (90) days of imprisonment.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 261, § 4; C.P.A. 1905, § 1158; G.L. 1909, ch. 327, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 378, § 1; P.L. 1929, ch. 1331, § 12; G.L. 1938, ch. 564, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

10-13-27

; P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 56.

10-13-28.
Examination of tort debtor — Assignment of property — Administration of oath.

Upon the receipt of any petition of any poor tort debtor under the provisions of §

10-13-27

, the justice to whom the petition shall be addressed shall fix a time and place for the hearing of the petition, and shall issue a citation, directed to the committing creditor or to his or her attorney of record in the suit, or if the committing creditor be deceased, to the legal representative of the deceased creditor, which citation shall be served upon one of the persons to whom it is directed at least six (6) days before the return day thereof. Upon the return of the citation duly served, the justice shall cause the petitioner to be brought before him or her upon habeas corpus at the time and place named in the citation, and either then or at such other time as the justice shall appoint, shall proceed to examine the petitioner and to hear the evidence which may be properly adduced in favor of and against the granting of the prayer of the petition, and if it shall be made to appear that the petitioner has no property, rights, or credits with which to pay prison charges, or which is not exempt by law from attachment, and that the debtor has made an assignment to the warden in the manner prescribed in §

10-13-7

, if the justice shall be of the opinion that the petitioner can truly take the oath prescribed in §

10-13-8

, the justice may administer to the petitioner the oath, and the like certificate shall be issued thereof, and the certificate shall have the like effect in all respects with reference to the discharge of the petitioner from the correctional institution, and the issue of execution, or of alias or pluries execution, upon the judgment shall be in the form and with the like effect, as if the petitioner had been entitled to and admitted to take the poor debtor’s oath under the provisions of §§

10-13-1

—

10-13-26

.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 261, § 5; C.P.A. 1905, § 1159; G.L. 1909, ch. 327, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 378, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 564, § 2; impl. am. P.L. 1956, ch. 3721, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

10-13-29

.

10-13-29.
Costs paid by debtor.

The cost of the service of citation and the writ of habeas corpus issued under the provisions of §§

10-13-27

and

10-13-28

shall be paid by the petitioner for relief hereunder.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 261, § 6; G.L. 1909, ch. 327, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 378, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 564, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

10-13-29

.